Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1542.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 493(13) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended to read:Section 493. Unlawful Acts Relative to Liquor, Malt and Brewed Beverages and Licensees.--The term "licensee," when used in this section, shall mean those persons licensed under the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 provisions of Article IV, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.It shall be unlawful--* * *(13) Retail Licensees Employing Minors. For any hotel, restaurant or club liquor licensee, or any retail dispenser, to employ or to permit any minor under the age of eighteen to serve any alcoholic beverages or to employ or permit any minor under the age of sixteen to render any service whatever in the licensed premises, nor shall any entertainer under the age of eighteen be employed or permitted to perform in any licensed premises in violation of the labor laws of this Commonwealth: Provided, That in accordance with board regulations minors between the ages of sixteen and eighteen may be employed to serve food, clear tables and perform other similar duties, not to include the dispensing or serving of alcoholic beverages. A ski resort, golf course or amusement park licensee may employ minors between the ages of fourteen and fifteen [years of age] to perform duties in rooms or areas of the licensed premises; however, such minors may not perform duties in rooms or areas in which alcohol is being concurrently dispensed or served or in which alcohol is being concurrently stored in an unsecured manner. An organization established as a nonprofit organization under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.), operating in a city of the second class or a county of the second class and providing educational programming designed to provide culinary and life skills, together with support services and resources, to criminal-justice-system-involved juveniles and young adults may employ minors between the ages of fifteen and eighteen to serve 20250HB1542PN1813 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 food, clear tables and perform other similar duties, not to include the dispensing or serving of alcoholic beverages. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, a hotel, restaurant or club liquor licensee or any retail dispenser may allow students receiving instruction in a performing art to perform an exhibition if the students are not compensated and are under proper supervision. Written notice of the performance must be provided to the enforcement bureau prior to the performance.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1542PN1813 - 3 - 1234567891011